Hawaii, session 2026, SB3164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that child welfare service organizations provide essential, mandated services to children and families in partnership with the State, that otherwise would have to be performed by the State itself.  The legislature further finds that these child welfare service organizations are now facing extreme challenges in securing general and professional liability insurance coverage.  Many insurance carriers have withdrawn from the market, reduced coverage limits, or imposed drastically higher premiums, making coverage either unavailable or unaffordable. The legislature additionally finds that without adequate liability insurance coverage, child welfare service organizations cannot maintain state contracts or deliver critically needed services.  The legislature also finds that rising insurance costs combined with stagnant contract reimbursements threaten the financial sustainability of these child welfare service organizations.  These circumstances risk disrupting services provided by child welfare service organizations under contract with the State, which would leave vulnerable children and families without necessary resources and place an unsustainable burden on state agencies. The legislature finds that the underlying cause of the crisis faced by these child welfare service organizations is the growing frequency and severity of lawsuits involving child-related tragedies.  Litigation strategies often include naming child welfare service organizations in lawsuits even when they are not found responsible, resulting in nuclear judgments that destabilize the insurance market.  As a result, child welfare service organizations are increasingly forced to rely on excess and surplus lines of insurance coverage, which offers reduced liability protection at significantly higher costs. The legislature believes that if this issue is not addressed, child welfare service organizations may withdraw from this type of work, creating significant gaps in services and straining state agencies that are tasked with filling those gaps.  The legislature further finds that legislative and administrative solutions are needed to ensure that child welfare service organizations can obtain reasonable and sustainable liability insurance coverage, thereby safeguarding the continuity of essential services for children and families across the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide certain limited liability protections for nonprofit child welfare service organizations that contract with the State to provide child welfare services to children and families, including: (1)  Prohibiting contracts between child welfare service organizations and the State from including state indemnification clauses or requiring the State to be an additional insured under child welfare service organization insurance policies; and (2)  Eliminating joint and several liability for child welfare service organizations by limiting liability to each organization's percentage share of damages. SECTION 2. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter CHILD WELFARE SERVICE ORGANIZATIONS §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Child welfare service organization" means a child welfare service organization that is contracted with the department of human services to provide services to children and families. §   -2  Child welfare service organizations; state contracts; indemnification; additional insured.  (a)  Any contract entered into between a child welfare service organization and the State shall not require that the child welfare service organization defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the State and its officers, agents, and employees from any claims, suits, costs, or attorney's fees. (b)  Any insurance policy obtained by a child welfare service organization shall not require that the State, and its officers, agents, and employees, be named as an additional insured. §   -3  Child welfare service organization as a tortfeasor; abolition of joint and several liability.  (a)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in any case in which a child welfare service organization is determined to be a tortfeasor along with one or more other tortfeasors, the child welfare service organization shall be liable for not more than that percentage share of the damages attributable to the child welfare service organization. (b)  For the purposes of this section, the liability of a child welfare service organization shall include its vicarious liability for the acts or omissions of its officers, agents, and employees." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________